Illinois, session 104th, HB4804.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Sections 50-10 and 70-5 and by adding Sections 60-36, 60-37, 660-38, 60-39, 60-41, 60-42, and 70-27 as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 65/50-10)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-10)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)9    Sec. 50-10. Definitions. Each of the following terms, when 10used in this Act, shall have the meaning ascribed to it in this 11Section, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:12    "Academic year" means the customary annual schedule of 13courses at a college, university, or approved school, 14customarily regarded as the school year as distinguished from 15the calendar year.16    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 17by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 18file or license file as maintained by the Department's 19licensure maintenance unit.20    "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a 21person who has met the qualifications for a (i) certified 22nurse midwife (CNM); (ii) certified nurse practitioner (CNP); 23(iii) certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA); or (iv)   HB4804- 2 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1clinical nurse specialist (CNS) and has been licensed by the 2Department. All advanced practice registered nurses licensed 3and practicing in the State of Illinois shall use the title 4APRN and may use specialty credentials CNM, CNP, CRNA, or CNS 5after their name. All advanced practice registered nurses may 6only practice in accordance with national certification and 7this Act. 8    "Advisory Board" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce 9Center Advisory Board.10    "Affect recognition" means technology that infers a 11person's emotions, mood, mental state, or intent from voice, 12facial expression, physiology, behavior, or other signals. 13    "Approved program of professional nursing education" and 14"approved program of practical nursing education" are programs 15of professional or practical nursing, respectively, approved 16by the Department under the provisions of this Act.17    "Artificial intelligence" and "generative artificial 18intelligence" have the meanings given to those terms in 19Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 20    "Board" means the Board of Nursing appointed by the 21Secretary.22    "Center" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce Center.23    "Clinical decision support" means information presented to 24a nurse that assists clinical judgment and allows independent 25review of the basis for any recommendation. 26    "Collaboration" means a process involving 2 or more health   HB4804- 3 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1care professionals working together, each contributing one's 2respective area of expertise to provide more comprehensive 3patient care.4    "Competence" means an expected and measurable level of 5performance that integrates knowledge, skills, abilities, and 6judgment based on established scientific knowledge and 7expectations for nursing practice. 8    "Comprehensive nursing assessment" means the gathering of 9information about the patient's physiological, psychological, 10sociological, and spiritual status on an ongoing basis by a 11registered professional nurse and is the first step in 12implementing and guiding the nursing plan of care. 13    "Consent" means a written, informed, freely given, 14specific, and unambiguous agreement by the patient or the 15patient's representative to the use of artificial intelligence 16in connection with a recorded or transcribed encounter. 17    "Consultation" means the process whereby an advanced 18practice registered nurse seeks the advice or opinion of 19another health care professional.20    "Credentialed" means the process of assessing and 21validating the qualifications of a health care professional.22    "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry 23under the Illinois Dental Practice Act.24    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 25Professional Regulation.26    "Direct patient care" means any activity involving   HB4804- 4 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1assessment, planning, intervention, education, delegation, or 2evaluation that affects an identifiable patient. 3    "Email address of record" means the designated email 4address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 5application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 6by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.7    "Focused nursing assessment" means an appraisal of an 8individual's status and current situation, contributing to the 9comprehensive nursing assessment performed by the registered 10professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse or 11the assessment by the physician assistant, physician, dentist, 12podiatric physician, or other licensed health care 13professional, as determined by the Department, supporting 14ongoing data collection, and deciding who needs to be informed 15of the information and when to inform. 16    "Full practice authority" means the authority of an 17advanced practice registered nurse licensed in Illinois and 18certified as a nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, 19or nurse midwife to practice without a written collaborative 20agreement and: 21        (1) to be fully accountable to patients for the 22    quality of advanced nursing care rendered; 23        (2) to be fully accountable for recognizing limits of 24    knowledge and experience and for planning for the 25    management of situations beyond the advanced practice 26    registered nurse's expertise; the full practice authority   HB4804- 5 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    for advanced practice registered nurses includes accepting 2    referrals from, consulting with, collaborating with, or 3    referring to other health care professionals as warranted 4    by the needs of the patient; and 5        (3) to possess the authority to prescribe medications, 6    including Schedule II through V controlled substances, as 7    provided in Section 65-43. 8    "Full practice authority-pending advanced practice 9registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse 10licensed in Illinois and certified as a nurse practitioner, 11clinical nurse specialist, or nurse midwife who has provided a 12notarized attestation of completion of at least 250 hours of 13continuing education or training in the advanced practice 14registered nurse's area of certification and at least 4,000 15hours of clinical experience after first attaining national 16certification and who has submitted an application to the 17Department to be granted full practice authority. 18    "Hospital affiliate" means a corporation, partnership, 19joint venture, limited liability company, or similar 20organization, other than a hospital, that is devoted primarily 21to the provision, management, or support of health care 22services and that directly or indirectly controls, is 23controlled by, or is under common control of the hospital. For 24the purposes of this definition, "control" means having at 25least an equal or a majority ownership or membership interest. 26A hospital affiliate shall be 100% owned or controlled by any   HB4804- 6 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1combination of hospitals, their parent corporations, or 2physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 3in Illinois. "Hospital affiliate" does not include a health 4maintenance organization regulated under the Health 5Maintenance Organization Act. 6    "Impaired nurse" means a nurse licensed under this Act who 7is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety because 8of a physical or mental disability as evidenced by a written 9determination or written consent based on clinical evidence, 10including loss of motor skills, abuse of drugs or alcohol, or a 11psychiatric disorder, of sufficient degree to diminish his or 12her ability to deliver competent patient care.13    "License-pending advanced practice registered nurse" means 14a registered professional nurse who has completed all 15requirements for licensure as an advanced practice registered 16nurse except the certification examination and has applied to 17take the next available certification exam and received a 18temporary permit from the Department.19    "License-pending registered nurse" means a person who has 20passed the Department-approved registered nurse licensure exam 21and has applied for a license from the Department. A 22license-pending registered nurse shall use the title "RN lic 23pend" on all documentation related to nursing practice.24    "Maternity care desert" means a county without any 25hospital, any birth center, or any licensed health care 26professional offering obstetric care.   HB4804- 7 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    "Nursing intervention" means any treatment based on 2clinical nursing judgment or knowledge that a nurse performs. 3An individual or entity shall not mandate that a registered 4professional nurse delegate nursing interventions if the 5registered professional nurse determines it is inappropriate 6to do so. A nurse shall not be subject to disciplinary or any 7other adverse action for refusing to delegate a nursing 8intervention based on patient safety. 9    "Nonclinical information service" means educational or 10self-help content that does not purport to provide nursing 11services, clinical advice, diagnosis, or treatment for an 12identifiable patient. 13    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 14in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.15    "Podiatric physician" means a person licensed to practice 16podiatry under the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 17    "Practical nurse" or "licensed practical nurse" means a 18person who is licensed as a practical nurse under this Act and 19practices practical nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 20practical nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use the 21title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation 22"L.P.N.".23    "Practical nursing" means the performance of nursing 24interventions requiring the nursing knowledge, judgment, and 25skill acquired by means of completion of an approved practical 26nursing education program. Practical nursing includes   HB4804- 8 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1assisting in the nursing process under the guidance of a 2registered professional nurse or an advanced practice 3registered nurse. The practical nurse may work under the 4direction of a licensed physician, dentist, podiatric 5physician, or other health care professional determined by the 6Department.7    "Privileged" means the authorization granted by the 8governing body of a healthcare facility, agency, or 9organization to provide specific patient care services within 10well-defined limits, based on qualifications reviewed in the 11credentialing process. 12    "Professional assistance program for nurses" means a 13professional assistance program that meets criteria 14established by the Board of Nursing and approved by the 15Secretary, which provides a non-disciplinary treatment 16approach for nurses licensed under this Act whose ability to 17practice is compromised by alcohol or chemical substance 18addiction.19    "Recorded or transcribed encounter" means any audio, 20video, or text capture of a clinical interaction that is 21processed by software to produce notes, transcripts, 22summaries, risk scores, or recommendations for direct patient 23care. 24    "Registered Nurse" or "Registered Professional Nurse" 25means a person who is licensed as a professional nurse under 26this Act and practices nursing as defined in this Act. Only a   HB4804- 9 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1registered nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use 2the titles "registered nurse" and "registered professional 3nurse" and the abbreviation, "R.N.".4    "Registered professional nursing practice" means a 5scientific process founded on a professional body of knowledge 6that includes, but is not limited to, the protection, 7promotion, and optimization of health and abilities, 8prevention of illness and injury, development and 9implementation of the nursing plan of care, facilitation of 10nursing interventions to alleviate suffering, care 11coordination, and advocacy in the care of individuals, 12families, groups, communities, and populations. "Registered 13professional nursing practice" does not include the act of 14medical diagnosis or prescription of medical therapeutic or 15corrective measures.16    "Risk scoring" means any algorithmic score or 17classification that ranks a patient's likelihood of events 18such as deterioration, readmission, utilization, mortality, 19self-harm, or nonadherence. 20    "Professional assistance program for nurses" means a 21professional assistance program that meets criteria 22established by the Board of Nursing and approved by the 23Secretary, which provides a non-disciplinary treatment 24approach for nurses licensed under this Act whose ability to 25practice is compromised by alcohol or chemical substance 26addiction.  HB4804- 10 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 2Professional Regulation.3    "Unencumbered license" means a license issued in good 4standing.5    "Written collaborative agreement" means a written 6agreement between an advanced practice registered nurse and a 7collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric physician 8pursuant to Section 65-35. 9(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-686, eff. 1-1-25; 10104-244, eff. 1-1-26.) 11    (225 ILCS 65/60-36 new)12    Sec. 60-36. Use of artificial intelligence in recorded or 13transcribed encounters.14    (a) A registered professional nurse shall obtain consent 15before using artificial intelligence to record, transcribe, 16summarize, or analyze a clinical encounter or its artifacts 17for direct patient care. A registered professional nurse may 18not obtain consent through the use of prechecked boxes, 19blanket terms of service, take it or leave it conditions, or 20other dark patterns. A patient may revoke consent at any time, 21and revocation must be honored without delay.22    (b) A registered professional nurse shall provide a clear 23mechanism for the revocation of consent. Upon revocation of 24consent, processing stops, and previously generated outputs 25shall not be used for clinical decisions unless required to   HB4804- 11 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1preserve the medical record.2    (c) This Section does not diminish any federal or State 3confidentiality protections. 4    (225 ILCS 65/60-37 new)5    Sec. 60-37. Prohibition on substituting artificial 6intelligence for nursing services.7    (a) An artificial intelligence system shall not provide 8nursing services in place of a registered professional nurse 9in direct patient care.10    (b) An artificial intelligence system shall not perform or 11be assigned any of the following:12        (1) A comprehensive or focused nursing assessment.13        (2) Nursing judgment or clinical decision-making.14        (3) Nursing diagnosis or problem identification.15        (4) Development, approval, or modification of a 16    nursing plan of care.17        (5) Delegation decisions.18        (6) Patient education or counseling that requires 19    clinical judgment.20        (7) Evaluation of patient responses and outcomes.21        (8) Affect recognition used for clinical decisions.22        (9) Risk scoring used for clinical decisions without 23    human review and approval by a nurse.24        (10) Triage, admission, discharge, or transfer 25    determinations without human review and approval by a   HB4804- 12 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    nurse.2    (c) Any output from an artificial intelligence system is 3advisory only. A registered professional nurse shall not rely 4on any output without independent review for clinical validity 5and relevance to the patient. 6    (225 ILCS 65/60-38 new)7    Sec. 60-38. Use of artificial intelligence as clinical 8decision support under the control of a registered 9professional nurse.10    (a) A registered professional nurse shall use artificial 11intelligence only as clinical decision support or for 12administrative tasks that do not constitute nursing services.13    (b) The registered professional nurse remains responsible 14and accountable for all nursing services. The registered 15professional nurse shall review, interpret, and document the 16rationale for accepting or rejecting any output from 17artificial intelligence.18    (c) A registered professional nurse has the right to 19refuse use or delegation when patient safety requires refusal. 20An employer shall not retaliate for a good faith refusal under 21this Section. 22    (225 ILCS 65/60-39 new)23    Sec. 60-39. Artificial intelligence; patient notice and 24transparency.  HB4804- 13 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    (a) If a registered professional nurse uses artificial 2intelligence in direct patient care, the treatment record 3shall include the system name, version, and a brief 4description of the role or artificial intelligence.5    (b) Patients shall receive written notice in plain 6language that states artificial intelligence supports the 7decision-making of a registered professional nurse and does 8not replace a registered professional nurse. The notice shall 9be included in the admission packet and posted in a 10conspicuous location in the care setting. 11    (225 ILCS 65/60-41 new)12    Sec. 60-41. Artificial intelligence; confidentiality 13protections.14    (a) Use of artificial intelligence does not diminish, 15waive, or alter any confidentiality or privacy obligation 16under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act 17of 1996 and its regulations, the Medical Patient Rights Act, 18or any other applicable law.19    (b) A registered professional nurse shall ensure that 20vendors or business associates processing data for artificial 21intelligence comply with all confidentiality or privacy 22obligations under the Health Insurance Portability and 23Accountability Act of 1996 and its regulations, the Medical 24Patient Rights Act, or any other applicable law.   HB4804- 14 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    (225 ILCS 65/60-42 new)2    Sec. 60-42. Artificial intelligence; exceptions for 3nonclinical activity.4    (a) Sections 60-36 through 60-41 do not apply to 5nonclinical information services that provide general 6education or self-help content to the public and do not 7purport to provide nursing services, clinical advice, 8diagnosis, or treatment to an identifiable patient.9    (b) Sections 60-36 through 60-41 does not restrict 10administrative uses that do not affect clinical decisions for 11an identifiable patient, including supply management, room 12assignment logistics, or claims processing, provided a 13registered professional nurse's clinical judgment is not 14displaced. 15    (225 ILCS 65/70-5)  (was 225 ILCS 65/10-45)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)17    Sec. 70-5. Grounds for disciplinary action. 18    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or to renew, or may 19revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 20disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 21deem appropriate, including fines not to exceed $10,000 per 22violation, with regard to a license for any one or combination 23of the causes set forth in subsection (b) below. All fines 24collected under this Section shall be deposited in the Nursing 25Dedicated and Professional Fund.  HB4804- 15 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    (b) Grounds for disciplinary action include the following:2        (1) Material deception in furnishing information to 3    the Department.4        (2) Material violations of any provision of this Act 5    or violation of the rules of or final administrative 6    action of the Secretary, after consideration of the 7    recommendation of the Board.8        (3) Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 9    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 10    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 11    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 12    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 13    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States: (i) 14    that is a felony; or (ii) that is a misdemeanor, an 15    essential element of which is dishonesty, or that is 16    directly related to the practice of the profession.17        (4) A pattern of practice or other behavior which 18    demonstrates incapacity or incompetency to practice under 19    this Act.20        (5) Knowingly aiding or assisting another person in 21    violating any provision of this Act or rules.22        (6) Failing, within 90 days, to provide a response to 23    a request for information in response to a written request 24    made by the Department by certified or registered mail or 25    by email to the email address of record.26        (7) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or   HB4804- 16 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 2    defraud, or harm the public, as defined by rule.3        (8) Unlawful taking, theft, selling, distributing, or 4    manufacturing of any drug, narcotic, or prescription 5    device.6        (9) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to alcohol, 7    narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug 8    that could result in a licensee's inability to practice 9    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.10        (10) Discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or 11    foreign nation, if at least one of the grounds for the 12    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 13    those set forth in this Section.14        (11) A finding that the licensee, after having her or 15    his license placed on probationary status or subject to 16    conditions or restrictions, has violated the terms of 17    probation or failed to comply with such terms or 18    conditions.19        (12) Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 20    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 21    and under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, 22    and upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 23    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 24    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 25    Child Reporting Act.26        (13) Willful omission to file or record, or willfully   HB4804- 17 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    impeding the filing or recording or inducing another 2    person to omit to file or record medical reports as 3    required by law. 4        (13.5) Willfully failing to report an instance of 5    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 6    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.7        (14) Gross negligence in the practice of practical, 8    professional, or advanced practice registered nursing.9        (15) Holding oneself out to be practicing nursing 10    under any name other than one's own.11        (16) Failure of a licensee to report to the Department 12    any adverse final action taken against him or her by 13    another licensing jurisdiction of the United States or any 14    foreign state or country, any peer review body, any health 15    care institution, any professional or nursing society or 16    association, any governmental agency, any law enforcement 17    agency, or any court or a nursing liability claim related 18    to acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct that would 19    constitute grounds for action as defined in this Section.20        (17) Failure of a licensee to report to the Department 21    surrender by the licensee of a license or authorization to 22    practice nursing or advanced practice registered nursing 23    in another state or jurisdiction or current surrender by 24    the licensee of membership on any nursing staff or in any 25    nursing or advanced practice registered nursing or 26    professional association or society while under   HB4804- 18 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    disciplinary investigation by any of those authorities or 2    bodies for acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct that 3    would constitute grounds for action as defined by this 4    Section.5        (18) Failing, within 60 days, to provide information 6    in response to a written request made by the Department.7        (19) Failure to establish and maintain records of 8    patient care and treatment as required by law.9        (20) Fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in applying 10    for or procuring a license under this Act or in connection 11    with applying for renewal of a license under this Act.12        (21) Allowing another person or organization to use 13    the licensee's license to deceive the public.14        (22) Willfully making or filing false records or 15    reports in the licensee's practice, including, but not 16    limited to, false records to support claims against the 17    medical assistance program of the Department of Healthcare 18    and Family Services (formerly Department of Public Aid) 19    under the Illinois Public Aid Code.20        (23) Attempting to subvert or cheat on a licensing 21    examination administered under this Act.22        (24) Immoral conduct in the commission of an act, 23    including, but not limited to, sexual abuse, sexual 24    misconduct, or sexual exploitation, related to the 25    licensee's practice.26        (25) Willfully or negligently violating the   HB4804- 19 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    confidentiality between nurse and patient except as 2    required by law.3        (26) Practicing under a false or assumed name, except 4    as provided by law.5        (27) The use of any false, fraudulent, or deceptive 6    statement in any document connected with the licensee's 7    practice.8        (28) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 9    from a person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 10    association a fee, commission, rebate, or other form of 11    compensation for professional services not actually or 12    personally rendered. Nothing in this paragraph (28) 13    affects any bona fide independent contractor or employment 14    arrangements among health care professionals, health 15    facilities, health care providers, or other entities, 16    except as otherwise prohibited by law. Any employment 17    arrangements may include provisions for compensation, 18    health insurance, pension, or other employment benefits 19    for the provision of services within the scope of the 20    licensee's practice under this Act. Nothing in this 21    paragraph (28) shall be construed to require an employment 22    arrangement to receive professional fees for services 23    rendered. 24        (29) A violation of the Health Care Worker 25    Self-Referral Act.26        (30) Physical illness, mental illness, or disability   HB4804- 20 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    that results in the inability to practice the profession 2    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety.3        (31) Exceeding the terms of a collaborative agreement 4    or the prescriptive authority delegated to a licensee by 5    his or her collaborating physician or podiatric physician 6    in guidelines established under a written collaborative 7    agreement.8        (32) Making a false or misleading statement regarding 9    a licensee's skill or the efficacy or value of the 10    medicine, treatment, or remedy prescribed by him or her in 11    the course of treatment.12        (33) Prescribing, selling, administering, 13    distributing, giving, or self-administering a drug 14    classified as a controlled substance (designated product) 15    or narcotic for other than medically accepted therapeutic 16    purposes.17        (34) Promotion of the sale of drugs, devices, 18    appliances, or goods provided for a patient in a manner to 19    exploit the patient for financial gain.20        (35) Violating State or federal laws, rules, or 21    regulations relating to controlled substances.22        (36) Willfully or negligently violating the 23    confidentiality between an advanced practice registered 24    nurse, collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric 25    physician and a patient, except as required by law.26        (37) Willfully failing to report an instance of   HB4804- 21 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 2    self-neglect of an eligible adult as defined in and 3    required by the Adult Protective Services Act.4        (38) Being named as an abuser in a verified report by 5    the Department on Aging and under the Adult Protective 6    Services Act, and upon proof by clear and convincing 7    evidence that the licensee abused, neglected, or 8    financially exploited an eligible adult as defined in the 9    Adult Protective Services Act. 10        (39) A violation of any provision of this Act or any 11    rules adopted under this Act.12        (40) Violating the Compassionate Use of Medical 13    Cannabis Program Act. 14        (41) Use of artificial intelligence in place of a 15    registered professional nurse for any act listed in 16    Section 60-37, directing any person to do so, failure to 17    obtain consent required by Section 60-36, or failure to 18    make the disclosures required by Section 60-39, 19    constitutes unprofessional conduct and grounds for 20    discipline. 21    (b-5) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, summarily 22suspend, place on probation, reprimand, refuse to issue or 23renew, or take any other disciplinary or non-disciplinary 24action against a person's authorization to practice under this 25Act based solely upon the person providing, authorizing, 26recommending, aiding, assisting, referring for, or otherwise   HB4804- 22 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1participating in any health care service, so long as the care 2was not unlawful under the laws of this State, regardless of 3whether the patient was a resident of this State or another 4state.5    (b-10) The Department shall not revoke, suspend, summarily 6suspend, place on prohibition, reprimand, refuse to issue or 7renew, or take any other disciplinary or non-disciplinary 8action against a person's authorization to practice under this 9Act based upon the person's license, registration, or permit 10being revoked or suspended, or the person being otherwise 11disciplined, by any other state if that revocation, 12suspension, or other form of discipline was based solely on 13the person violating another state's laws prohibiting the 14provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding or 15assisting in, referring for, or participation in any health 16care service if that health care service as provided would not 17have been unlawful under the laws of this State and is 18consistent with the applicable standard of conduct for the 19person practicing in Illinois under this Act.20    (b-15) The conduct specified in subsections (b-5) and 21(b-10) shall not trigger reporting requirements under Section 2265-65 or constitute grounds for suspension under Section 2370-60.24    (b-20) An applicant seeking licensure, certification, or 25authorization under this Act who has been subject to 26disciplinary action by a duly authorized professional   HB4804- 23 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1disciplinary agency of another jurisdiction solely on the 2basis of having provided, authorized, recommended, aided, 3assisted, referred for, or otherwise participated in health 4care shall not be denied such licensure, certification, or 5authorization, unless the Department determines that such 6action would have constituted professional misconduct in this 7State; however, nothing in this Section shall be construed as 8prohibiting the Department from evaluating the conduct of such 9applicant and making a determination regarding the licensure, 10certification, or authorization to practice a profession under 11this Act. 12    (c) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 13is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 14provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 15Code, as amended, operates as an automatic suspension. The 16suspension will end only upon a finding by a court that the 17patient is no longer subject to involuntary admission or 18judicial admission and issues an order so finding and 19discharging the patient; and upon the recommendation of the 20Board to the Secretary that the licensee be allowed to resume 21his or her practice.22    (d) The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend or 23otherwise discipline the license of any person who fails to 24file a return, or to pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in 25a filed return, or to pay any final assessment of the tax, 26penalty, or interest as required by any tax Act administered   HB4804- 24 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1by the Department of Revenue, until such time as the 2requirements of any such tax Act are satisfied.3    (e) In enforcing this Act, the Department, upon a showing 4of a possible violation, may compel an individual licensed to 5practice under this Act or who has applied for licensure under 6this Act, to submit to a mental or physical examination, or 7both, as required by and at the expense of the Department. The 8Department may order the examining physician to present 9testimony concerning the mental or physical examination of the 10licensee or applicant. No information shall be excluded by 11reason of any common law or statutory privilege relating to 12communications between the licensee or applicant and the 13examining physician. The examining physicians shall be 14specifically designated by the Department. The individual to 15be examined may have, at his or her own expense, another 16physician of his or her choice present during all aspects of 17this examination. Failure of an individual to submit to a 18mental or physical examination, when directed, shall result in 19an automatic suspension without hearing.20    All substance-related violations shall mandate an 21automatic substance abuse assessment. Failure to submit to an 22assessment by a licensed physician who is certified as an 23addictionist or an advanced practice registered nurse with 24specialty certification in addictions may be grounds for an 25automatic suspension, as defined by rule. 26    If the Department finds an individual unable to practice   HB4804- 25 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1or unfit for duty because of the reasons set forth in this 2subsection (e), the Department may require that individual to 3submit to a substance abuse evaluation or treatment by 4individuals or programs approved or designated by the 5Department, as a condition, term, or restriction for 6continued, restored, or renewed licensure to practice; or, in 7lieu of evaluation or treatment, the Department may file, or 8the Board may recommend to the Department to file, a complaint 9to immediately suspend, revoke, or otherwise discipline the 10license of the individual. An individual whose license was 11granted, continued, restored, renewed, disciplined, or 12supervised subject to such terms, conditions, or restrictions, 13and who fails to comply with such terms, conditions, or 14restrictions, shall be referred to the Secretary for a 15determination as to whether the individual shall have his or 16her license suspended immediately, pending a hearing by the 17Department.18    In instances in which the Secretary immediately suspends a 19person's license under this subsection (e), a hearing on that 20person's license must be convened by the Department within 15 21days after the suspension and completed without appreciable 22delay. The Department and Board shall have the authority to 23review the subject individual's record of treatment and 24counseling regarding the impairment to the extent permitted by 25applicable federal statutes and regulations safeguarding the 26confidentiality of medical records.  HB4804- 26 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    An individual licensed under this Act and affected under 2this subsection (e) shall be afforded an opportunity to 3demonstrate to the Department that he or she can resume 4practice in compliance with nursing standards under the 5provisions of his or her license.6    (f) The Department may adopt rules to implement, 7administer, and enforce this Section. 8(Source: P.A. 104-432, eff. 1-1-26.) 9    (225 ILCS 65/70-27 new)10    Sec. 70-27. Use of artificial intelligence in recorded or 11transcribed encounters by registered professional nurses; 12employers. 13    (a) A health care entity that employs registered 14professional nurses and deploys artificial intelligence in 15direct patient care shall do all of the following:16        (1) Maintain validation and bias monitoring records 17    for each system and make such records available to the 18    Department upon request.19        (2) Provide registered professional nurses with 20    training on intended use, data limits, and known failure 21    modes.22        (3) Ensure registered professional nurses have access 23    to data inputs and key factors that produced any 24    recommendation used in direct patient care.25        (4) Prohibit staffing, triage, admission, discharge,   HB4804- 27 -LRB104 19511 CCC 32959 b1    or transfer decisions that rely solely on artificial 2    intelligence. Human clinical review by a registered 3    professional nurse is required.4    (b) The Department may investigate any health care entity 5for a violation of this Section and regarding violations of 6Sections 60-36 through 60-41 of the Nurse Practice Act by a 7registered professional nurse employed by the health care 8entity.9    (c) The Department may impose a civil penalty on any 10health care entity that violates this Section. Each day of 11noncompliance is a separate offense.12    (d) Hearings on civil penalties under this Section shall 13follow the procedures set forth in the Department of 14Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 15of Illinois. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.